Hawaii statutes.
§383-45 Governing provisions. The
procedure with respect to the filing of claims and with respect to
determination and redeterminations thereupon and with respect to appeals from
such determinations and redeterminations and with respect to judicial review of
decisions on such appeals shall be governed by sections 383-31 to 383-43, any
other provisions of this chapter or of chapter 371 to the contrary
notwithstanding. [L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 18; RL 1945, §4245; RL 1955,
§93-44; HRS §383-45]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next